Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 5. Robbery, Extortion, and Coercion.

Collateral references. —

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Burglary, § 1 et seq.

31A Am. Jur. 2d, Extortion, Blackmail, and Threats, §§ 7-45.

50 Am. Jur. 2d, Larceny, § 1 et seq.

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Robbery, § 1 et seq.

12A C.J.S., Burglary, § 1 et seq.

35 C.J.S., Extortion, § 1 et seq.

52B C.J.S., Larceny, § 1 et seq.

77 C.J.S., Robbery, § 1 et seq.

“Intimidation” as element of bank robbery under 18 U.S.C.A. § 2113(a). 163 ALR Fed. 225.

Sec. 11.41.500.
Robbery in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of robbery in the first degree if the person violates AS

11.41.510

and, in the course of violating that section or in immediate flight thereafter, that person or another participant

is armed with a deadly weapon or represents by words or other conduct that either that person or another participant is so armed;

uses or attempts to use a dangerous instrument or a defensive weapon or represents by words or other conduct that either that person or another participant is armed with a dangerous instrument or a defensive weapon; or

causes or attempts to cause serious physical injury to any person.

Robbery in the first degree is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A felonies, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.41.510.
Robbery in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of robbery in the second degree if, in the course of taking or attempting to take property from the immediate presence and control of another, the person uses or threatens the immediate use of force upon any person with intent to

prevent or overcome resistance to the taking of the property or the retention of the property after taking; or

compel any person to deliver the property or engage in other conduct which might aid in the taking of the property.

Robbery in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “deadly weapon,” “dangerous instrument,” “serious physical injury,” “property,” “force” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Extortion - AS

11.41.520

Coercion - AS

11.41.530

Theft in the second degree (from the person) - AS

11.46.130(a)(2)

Assault in the first, second, third, and fourth degree - AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.230

Reckless endangerment - AS

11.41.250

Original Code Provision - AS 11.15.240; AS 11.15.160; AS 11.15.295.

TD:II, 81–83

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.41.520.
Extortion.

A person commits the crime of extortion if the person obtains the property of another by threatening or suggesting that either that person or another may

inflict physical injury on anyone, except under circumstances constituting robbery in any degree, or commit any other crime;

accuse anyone of a crime;

expose confidential information or a secret, whether true or false, tending to subject a person to hatred, contempt, or ridicule or to impair the person’s credit or business repute;

take or withhold action as a public servant or cause a public servant to take or withhold action;

bring about or continue a strike, boycott, or other collective unofficial action, if the property is not demanded or received for the benefit of the group in whose interest the person making the threat or suggestion purports to act;

testify or provide information or withhold testimony or information with respect to a person’s legal claim or defense; or

inflict any other harm which would not benefit the person making the threat or suggestion.

A threat or suggestion to perform any of the acts described in (a) of this section includes an offer to protect another from any harmful act when the offeror has no apparent means to provide the protection or when the price asked for rendering the protection service is grossly disproportionate to its cost to the offeror.

It is a defense to a prosecution based on (a)(2), (3), or (4) of this section that the property obtained by threat of accusation, exposure, lawsuit, or other invocation of official action was honestly claimed as restitution or indemnification for harm done in the circumstances to which the accusation, exposure, lawsuit, or other official action relates, or as compensation for property or lawful services.

In this section, “property of another” means property in which a person has an interest that the defendant is not privileged to infringe, whether or not the defendant also has an interest in the property and whether or not the person from whom the property was obtained or withheld also obtained the property unlawfully. “Property of another” does not include property in the possession of the defendant in which another has only a security interest, even if legal title is in the secured party under a conditional sales contract or other security agreement; in the absence of a specific agreement to the contrary, the holder of a security interest in property is not privileged to infringe the debtor’s right of possession without the consent of the debtor.

Extortion is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 1994)

Cross references. —

Definition of “physical injury,” “crime,” “public servant,” “defense,” “property,” “services” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Robbery in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.500

,

11.41.510

Coercion - AS

11.41.530

Attempted extortion - AS

11.31.100(d)(3)

Official misconduct - AS

11.56.850

Original Code Provision - AS

11.20.345

.

TD:III, 36–38.

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was formerly (e) and subsection (e) was formerly (d); relettered in 2002.

Legislative history reports. —

For explanation of the 1994 enactment of (e) (now (d)) of this section, see 1994 House Journal Supplement No. 12, February 22, 1994, page 2.

Sec. 11.41.530.
Coercion.

A person commits the crime of coercion if the person compels another to engage in conduct from which there is a legal right to abstain or abstain from conduct in which there is a legal right to engage, by means of instilling in the person who is compelled a fear that, if the demand is not complied with, the person who makes the demand or another may

inflict physical injury on anyone, except under circumstances constituting robbery in any degree, or commit any other crime;

accuse anyone of a crime;

expose confidential information or a secret, whether true or false, tending to subject a person to hatred, contempt, or ridicule or to impair the person’s credit or business repute;

take or withhold action as a public servant or cause a public servant to take or withhold action;

bring about or continue a strike, boycott, or other collective unofficial action, if the property is not demanded or received for the benefit of the group in whose interest the person making the threat or suggestion purports to act;

testify or provide information or withhold testimony or information with respect to a person’s legal claim or defense.

It is a defense to a prosecution under (a)(2), (3), or (4) of this section that the defendant reasonably believed that the accusation or exposure was true or that the lawsuit or other invocation of official action was justified and that the defendant’s sole intent was to compel or induce the victim to take reasonable action to correct the wrong that is the subject of the accusation, exposure, lawsuit, or invocation of official action or to refrain from committing an offense.

Coercion is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “physical injury,” “crime,” “public servant,” “property,” “defense” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Robbery in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.500

,

11.41.510

Extortion - AS

11.41.520

Official misconduct - AS

11.56.850

Original Code Provision - AS 11.15.300

TD: I, 65-68.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.